xapian-core/languages/algorithms/persian.sbl
        // -MAN/-TAN/-SHAN are intentionally disabled: these 3-char suffixes
        // are ambiguous with plurals of nouns whose root ends in the same letter:
        //   ketab+maan (our book)   -> strip -maan -> ketab  (correct)
        //   mardom+an  (people pl.) -> strip -an   -> mardom (correct, NOT mardom->mard)
        //   naqqash+an (painters)   -> strip -an   -> naqqash (correct, NOT ->naqqaa)
        //   derakht+an (trees)      -> strip -an   -> derakht (correct, NOT ->derakh)
        // Without a lexicon we cannot distinguish the two cases. The -AN
        // rule below handles both at the cost of missing possessive stripping.
        //        '{mim}{alef}{nun}'  (delete) // -MAN
        //        '{te}{alef}{nun}'   (delete) // -TAN
        //        '{shin}{alef}{nun}' (delete) // -SHAN

        // Noun plurals.
        // -YAN and -GAN are productive.
        '{ye}{alef}{nun}'   (delete) // -YAN
        '{gaf}{alef}{nun}'  (delete) // -GAN
        '{heh}{alef}{ye}'   (delete) // -HAY
        '{alef}{nun}{ye}'   (delete) // -ANI
        '{heh}{alef}'       (delete) // -HA
        '{alef}{te}'        (delete) // -AT (Arabic sound plural; can also be possessive "your")
        '{alef}{nun}'       (delete) // -AN (only if not lexical)
        '{ye}{nun}'         (delete) // -IN (also adjective derivation ending)

        // Other derivational noun endings (conservative set).
        '{gaf}{alef}{heh}'  (delete) // -GAH
        '{be}{alef}{nun}'   (delete) // -BAN
        '{gaf}{ye}'         (delete) // -GI (abstract noun)
        '{ye}{te}'          (delete) // -YAT
        '{ye}{ye}'          (delete) // -YY (double Y; also adj. relative -Y)

        // Adjective: comparative/superlative (HPS).
        '{te}{re}{ye}{nun}' (delete) // -TARIN
        '{te}{re}'          (not atlimit delete) // -TAR

        // Adjective derivational endings (HPS list + common variants).
        '{alef}{nun}{heh}'  (delete) // -ANE
        '{mim}{nun}{dal}'   (delete) // -MAND
        '{vav}{alef}{re}'   (delete) // -VAR
        '{nun}{alef}{kaf}'  (delete) // -NAK
        '{gaf}{alef}{re}'   (delete) // -GAR
      )
    )
  )

  // --- Verb step.
  define Stem_Verb as (
    (
      // Participle + person/aux clitic tails
      [substring] among (
        '{alef}{ye}{dal}'
        '{alef}{ye}{mim}'
        '{alef}{nun}{dal}'
        '{alef}{sin}{te}'
        '{alef}{sin}'
        '{alef}{ye}'
        '{ye}{dal}'
        '{ye}{mim}'
            (R1 delete)
      )
    ) or (
      [substring] among (
        // Generic person and singular/plural endings — only when a verb cue is active
        '{alef}{nun}{dal}'  // -AND
        '{ye}{dal}'         // -ID
        '{ye}{mim}'         // -IM
        '{alef}{mim}'       // -AM
        '{dal}'             // -D
        '{mim}'             // -M
            ( remove_verb_person_endings R1 delete )

        // Specific past-3sg stem fixes
        '{re}{fe}{te}{mim}'
        '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}'
        '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}{mim}'
        '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}{dal}'
        '{re}{fe}{te}{alef}{nun}{dal}'
            (<- '{re}{fe}{te}')

        // Mood/tense markers (HPS).
        '{nun}{dal}{heh}'   // agent noun -NDEH → present root
        '{alef}{nun}'       // infinitive -N / -AN
            (R1 delete set remove_verb_person_endings)
        '{dal}{heh}'        // past part. -deh
            (not atlimit <-'{dal}' set remove_verb_person_endings)
        '{te}{heh}'         // past part. -teh
            (not atlimit <-'{te}'  set remove_verb_person_endings)
      )
    )
  )
)

// ============================================================================
//  MAIN (HPS pipeline)
// ============================================================================
define stem as (
  unset saw_present_prefix

  // 1) Normalize script/spacing (ZWNJ preserved for prefix detection)
  do Normalize_Characters

  // 2) Handle leading prefixes (requires ZWNJ separator)
  do Prefixes

  // 2b) Delete remaining ZWNJs now that prefix detection is done
  do Delete_ZWNJ

  // Set p1 to be 3 characters into the string.
  $p1 = limit
  do ( hop 3 setmark p1 )

  // 3) Remove suffixes.  Each pass removes one suffix, trying noun and
  // adjective endings first, then verb endings.  So if we remove a noun
  // or adjective ending, we next check for another noun or adjective
  // ending.
  //
  // Note: The loop exits if no suffix is removed and the buffer gets
  // shorter when a suffix is removed so we can't loop forever.
  backwards repeat test (
    // Set remove_verb_person_endings = saw_present_prefix.
    unset remove_verb_person_endings
    try ( saw_present_prefix set remove_verb_person_endings )

    Protect_Lexical_AN
    // HPS as described in the paper uses a POS tagger.  We don't have that
    // information so we use a heuristic and try noun/adjective endings first,
    // then verb endings.
    Stem_Noun_or_Adjective or Stem_Verb
  )
)
